lexc/verb/enhuige2.lexc
LEXICON Case51
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§   #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t     #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


!hímzek, hímzel, hímzünk
!hímzem, hímzed, hímzi, hímzitek, hímzik

LEXICON AddVerb10
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case10;
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     AddInf30;

LEXICON Case10
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§   #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t     #;    ! t

!bizsereg:bizserg bizserget, bizsergettet, bizsergethet
LEXICON AddVerb20
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep20;

LEXICON Rep20
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§AA§t  Imper20;
                    Case21;

LEXICON Imper20
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep20;
                      Nrep22;

LEXICON Nrep20
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper20;
                      NImper22;
LEXICON Nrep22
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper20;
                      NImper22;

LEXICON NImper20
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot20;
                      Pot22;
LEXICON NImper22
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot20;
                      Pot22;

LEXICON Pot20
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf20;
             Case20;
LEXICON Pot22
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf20;
             Case20;

LEXICON AddInf20
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
            Case20;

LEXICON Verb
akadályversenyez:akadályversenyz AddVerb10;
autóversenyez:autóversenyz AddVerb10;
bizsereg:bizserg AddVerb20;
bélyegez:bélyegz AddVerb10;
csalánoz:csalánz AddVerb10;
csicsereg:csicserg AddVerb20;
címez:címz AddVerb10;
dalosversenyez:dalosversenyz AddVerb10;
didereg:diderg AddVerb20;
díszeleg:díszelg AddVerb20;
elemez:elemz AddVerb10;
ellenez:ellenz AddVerb10;
enyeleg:enyelg AddVerb20;
evezősversenyez:evezősversenyz AddVerb10;
feszeleg:feszelg AddVerb20;
futóversenyez:futóversenyz AddVerb10;
fémjelez:fémjelz AddVerb10;
hangversenyez:hangversenyz AddVerb10;
hempereg:hemperg AddVerb20;
hentereg:henterg AddVerb20;
holtversenyez:holtversenyz AddVerb10;
háziversenyez:háziversenyz AddVerb10;
hímez:hímz AddVerb10;
hízeleg:hízelg AddVerb20;
incseleg:incselg AddVerb20;
izeg:izg AddVerb20;
jegyez:jegyz AddVerb10;
jelez:jelz AddVerb10;
jellemez:jellemz AddVerb10;
juniorversenyez:juniorversenyz AddVerb10;
kecmereg:kecmerg AddVerb20;
kesereg:keserg AddVerb20;
kevereg:keverg AddVerb20;
krosszversenyez:krosszversenyz AddVerb10;
kultúrversenyez:kultúrversenyz AddVerb10;
kéjeleg:kéjelg AddVerb20;
képez:képz AddVerb10;
képzeleg:képzelg AddVerb20;
közeleg:közelg AddVerb20;
lélegez:lélegz AddVerb10;
lóversenyez:lóversenyz AddVerb10;
motokrosszversenyez:motokrosszversenyz AddVerb10;
nyekereg:nyekerg AddVerb20;
nyomorog:nyomorg AddVerb20;
pereg:perg AddVerb20;
pezseg:pezsg AddVerb20;
pityereg:pityerg AddVerb20;
rajtjelez:rajtjelz AddVerb10;
rejtjelez:rejtjelz AddVerb10;
rezeg:rezg AddVerb20;
rétegez:rétegz AddVerb10;
sebez:sebz AddVerb10;
sistereg:sisterg AddVerb20;
sportversenyez:sportversenyz AddVerb10;
szegélyez:szegélyz AddVerb10;
szemereg:szemerg AddVerb20;
szemez:szemz AddVerb10;
szendereg:szenderg AddVerb20;
szenveleg:szenvelg AddVerb20;
száraz:szárz AddVerb10;
szédeleg:szédelg AddVerb20;
szépeleg:szépelg AddVerb20;
tekereg:tekerg AddVerb20;
terem:term AddVerb20;
tetszeleg:tetszelg AddVerb20;
tiszteleg:tisztelg AddVerb20;
tévelyeg:tévelyg AddVerb20;
versenyez:versenyz AddVerb10;
vitorlásversenyez:vitorlásversenyz AddVerb10;
védjegyez:védjegyz AddVerb10;
végez:végz AddVerb10;
árversenyez:árversenyz AddVerb10;
édeleg:édelg AddVerb20;
éljenez:éljenz AddVerb10;
émelyeg:émelyg AddVerb20;
érzeleg:érzelg AddVerb20;
összegez:összegz AddVerb10;
öttusaversenyez:öttusaversenyz AddVerb10;
úszóversenyez:úszóversenyz AddVerb10;
őgyeleg:őgyelg AddVerb20;
